Utah statutes.
17-25-5.   Contracts for constable services.

(1)  The governing body of a municipality or county where a justice court exists may contract with a constable to provide services in criminal cases for the contracting governmental entity by a method and for an amount mutually agreed upon.

(2) (a)  A contract between a governing body and a constable, including a contract described in Subsection (1), may not exceed four years.

(b)  A contract described in Subsection (2)(a) may be renewed or extended for a period not to exceed four years.

